Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2899
Rules and regulations.

The department, with the recommendation of the board, shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations as deemed necessary to implement the Mail Service Pharmacy Licensure Act, the Pharmacy Practice Act, and the Uniform Controlled Substances Act. The minimum standards and requirements for the practice of pharmacy, including dispensing pursuant to a delegated dispensing permit, shall be consistent with the minimum standards and requirements established by the department for pharmacy licenses under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act.

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 27;

Laws 2003, LB 667, § 4;

Laws 2005, LB 538, § 20;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1,148;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 989;

Laws 2015, LB37, § 54.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.

Mail Service Pharmacy Licensure Act, see section 71-2406.

Uniform Controlled Substances Act, see section 28-401.01.